Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.263

Transportation function—Fuel purchasing strategies—Liability immunity.

If metropolitan municipal corporations and counties that have assumed the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of metropolitan municipal corporations under chapter 36.56 RCW choose to implement the strategies authorized in RCW 35.58.262, the state is not liable for any financial losses that may be incurred as the result of participating in such strategies.

[ 2008 c 126 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2008 c 126: See note following RCW 35.58.262.